Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1409
Courts; jurisdiction.

The district or county court of this state may exercise jurisdiction over any landlord or tenant with respect to any conduct in this state governed by the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act or with respect to any claim arising from a transaction subject to the act for a dwelling unit located within its jurisdictional boundaries.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 9;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 89;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 84;

Laws 2001, LB 7, § 8.